Texas statutes.
OCCUPATIONS CODE

TITLE 3. HEALTH PROFESSIONS

SUBTITLE B. PHYSICIANS

CHAPTER 157. AUTHORITY OF PHYSICIAN TO DELEGATE CERTAIN MEDICAL ACTS

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 157.001. GENERAL AUTHORITY OF PHYSICIAN TO DELEGATE. (a) A physician may delegate to a qualified and properly trained person acting under the physician's supervision any medical act that a reasonable and prudent physician would find within the scope of sound medical judgment to delegate if, in the opinion of the delegating physician:

(1) the act:

(A) can be properly and safely performed by the person to whom the medical act is delegated;

(B) is performed in its customary manner; and

(C) is not in violation of any other statute; and

(2) the person to whom the delegation is made does not represent to the public that the person is authorized to practice medicine.

(b) The delegating physician remains responsible for the medical acts of the person performing the delegated medical acts.

(c) The board may determine whether:

(1) an act constitutes the practice of medicine, not inconsistent with this chapter; and

(2) a medical act may be properly or safely delegated by physicians.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 157.002. GENERAL DELEGATION OF ADMINISTRATION AND PROVISION OF DANGEROUS DRUGS. (a) In this section:

(1) "Administering" means the direct application of a drug to the body of a patient by injection, inhalation, ingestion, or any other means.

(2) "Provision" means the supply of one or more unit doses of a drug, medicine, or dangerous drug.

(b) A physician may delegate to any qualified and properly trained person acting under the physician's supervision the act of administering or providing dangerous drugs in the physician's office, as ordered by the physician, that are used or required to meet the immediate needs of the physician's patients. The administration or provision of the dangerous drugs must be performed in compliance with laws relating to the practice of medicine and state and federal laws relating to those dangerous drugs.

(c) A physician may also delegate to any qualified and properly trained person acting under the physician's supervision the act of administering or providing dangerous drugs through a facility licensed by the Texas State Board of Pharmacy, as ordered by the physician, that are used or required to meet the immediate needs of the physician's patients. The administration of those dangerous drugs must be in compliance with laws relating to the practice of medicine, professional nursing, and pharmacy and state and federal drug laws. The provision of those dangerous drugs must be in compliance with:

(1) laws relating to the practice of medicine, professional nursing, and pharmacy;

(2) state and federal drug laws; and

(3) rules adopted by the Texas State Board of Pharmacy.

(d) In the provision of services and the administration of therapy by public health departments, as officially prescribed by the Texas Department of Health for the prevention or treatment of specific communicable diseases or health conditions for which the Texas Department of Health is responsible for control under state law, a physician may delegate to any qualified and properly trained person acting under the physician's supervision the act of administering or providing dangerous drugs, as ordered by the physician, that are used or required to meet the needs of the patients. The provision of those dangerous drugs must be in compliance with laws relating to the practice of medicine, professional nursing, and pharmacy. An order for the prevention or treatment of a specific communicable disease or health condition for which the Texas Department of Health is responsible for control under state law may not be inconsistent with this chapter and may not be used to perform an act or duty that requires the exercise of independent medical judgment.

(e) The administration or provision of the drugs may be delegated through a physician's order, a standing medical order, a standing delegation order, or another order defined by the board.

(f) Subsections (b) and (c) do not authorize a physician or a person acting under the supervision of a physician to keep a pharmacy, advertised or otherwise, for the retail sale of dangerous drugs, other than as authorized under Section 158.003, without complying with the applicable laws relating to the dangerous drugs.

(g) A drug or medicine provided under Subsection (b) or (c) must be supplied in a suitable container labeled in compliance with applicable drug laws. A qualified and trained person, acting under the supervision of a physician, may specify at the time of the provision of the drug the inclusion on the container of the date of the provision and the patient's name and address.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 157.003. EMERGENCY CARE. The authority to delegate medical acts to a properly qualified person as provided by this subchapter applies to emergency care provided by emergency medical personnel certified by the Texas Department of Health.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 157.004. DELEGATION REGARDING CERTAIN CARE FOR NEWBORNS; LIABILITY. (a) It is the policy of this state that the prevention of ophthalmia neonatorum in newborn infants is of paramount importance for the protection of the health of the children of this state.

(b) The authority to delegate medical acts to a midwife under Chapter 203 applies to the possession and administration of eye prophylaxis for the prevention of ophthalmia neonatorum.

(c) A physician who issues a standing delegation order to a midwife under Chapter 203 is not liable in connection with an act performed under that standing delegation order if the midwife provides proof of licensure under that chapter before the order is issued.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1240 (H.B. 1535), Sec. 53, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 157.005. PERFORMANCE OF DELEGATED ACT NOT PRACTICING WITHOUT MEDICAL LICENSE. A person to whom a physician delegates the performance of a medical act is not considered to be practicing medicine without a license by performing the medical act unless the person acts with knowledge that the delegation and the action taken under the delegation is a violation of this subtitle.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 157.006. LIMITATION ON BOARD RULES REGARDING DELEGATION. The board shall promote a physician's exercise of professional judgment to decide which medical acts may be safely delegated by not adopting rules containing, except as absolutely necessary, global prohibitions or restrictions on the delegation of medical acts.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 157.007. APPLICABILITY OF OTHER LAWS. An act delegated by a physician under this chapter must comply with other applicable laws.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

SUBCHAPTER B. DELEGATION TO ADVANCED PRACTICE REGISTERED NURSES AND PHYSICIAN ASSISTANTS

Sec. 157.051. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Advanced practice registered nurse" has the meaning assigned to that term by Section 301.152. The term includes an advanced nurse practitioner and advanced practice nurse.

(2) "Controlled substance" has the meaning assigned to that term by Section 481.002, Health and Safety Code.

(3) "Dangerous drug" has the meaning assigned to that term by Section 483.001, Health and Safety Code.

(4) "Device" has the meaning assigned by Section 551.003, and includes durable medical equipment.

(5) "Health professional shortage area" means:

(A) an urban or rural area of this state that:

(i) is not required to conform to the geographic boundaries of a political subdivision but is a rational area for the delivery of health services;

(ii) the secretary of health and human services determines has a health professional shortage; and

(iii) is not reasonably accessible to an adequately served area;

(B) a population group that the secretary of health and human services determines has a health professional shortage; or

(C) a public or nonprofit private medical facility or other facility that the secretary of health and human services determines has a health professional shortage, as described by 42 U.S.C. Section 254e(a)(1).

(6) "Hospital" means a facility that:

(A) is:

(i) a general hospital or a special hospital, as those terms are defined by Section 241.003, Health and Safety Code, including a hospital maintained or operated by the state; or

(ii) a mental hospital licensed under Chapter 577, Health and Safety Code; and

(B) has an organized medical staff.

(7) "Medication order" has the meanings assigned by Section 551.003 of this code and Section 481.002, Health and Safety Code.

(8) "Nonprescription drug" has the meaning assigned by Section 551.003.

(9) "Physician assistant" means a person who holds a license issued under Chapter 204.

(10) "Physician group practice" means an entity through which two or more physicians deliver health care to the public through the practice of medicine on a regular basis and that is:

(A) owned and operated by two or more physicians; or

(B) a freestanding clinic, center, or office of a nonprofit health organization certified by the board under Section 162.001(b) that complies with the requirements of Chapter 162.

(11) "Practice serving a medically underserved population" means:

(A) a practice in a health professional shortage area;

(B) a clinic designated as a rural health clinic under 42 U.S.C. Section 1395x(aa);

(C) a public health clinic or a family planning clinic under contract with the Health and Human Services Commission or the Department of State Health Services;

(D) a clinic designated as a federally qualified health center under 42 U.S.C. Section 1396d(l)(2)(B);

(E) a county, state, or federal correctional facility;

(F) a practice:

(i) that either:

(a) is located in an area in which the Department of State Health Services determines there is an insufficient number of physicians providing services to eligible clients of federally, state, or locally funded health care programs; or

(b) is a practice that the Department of State Health Services determines serves a disproportionate number of clients eligible to participate in federally, state, or locally funded health care programs; and

(ii) for which the Department of State Health Services publishes notice of the department's determination in the Texas Register and provides an opportunity for public comment in the manner provided for a proposed rule under Chapter 2001, Government Code; or

(G) a practice at which a physician was delegating prescriptive authority to an advanced practice registered nurse or physician assistant on or before March 1, 2013, based on the practice qualifying as a site serving a medically underserved population.

(12) "Prescribe or order a drug or device" means prescribing or ordering a drug or device, including the issuing of a prescription drug order or a medication order.

(13) "Prescription drug" has the meaning assigned by Section 551.003.

(14) "Prescriptive authority agreement" means an agreement entered into by a physician and an advanced practice registered nurse or physician assistant through which the physician delegates to the advanced practice registered nurse or physician assistant the act of prescribing or ordering a drug or device.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 88, Sec. 1, eff. May 20, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 269 (S.B. 419), Sec. 1.27, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 418 (S.B. 406), Sec. 2, eff. November 1, 2013.

Sec. 157.0511. DELEGATION OF PRESCRIBING AND ORDERING DRUGS AND DEVICES. (a) A physician's authority to delegate the prescribing or ordering of a drug or device under this subchapter is limited to:

(1) nonprescription drugs;

(2) dangerous drugs; and

(3) controlled substances to the extent provided by Subsections (b) and (b-1).

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (b-1), a physician may delegate the prescribing or ordering of a controlled substance only if:

(1) the prescription is for a controlled substance listed in Schedule III, IV, or V as established by the commissioner of the Department of State Health Services under Chapter 481, Health and Safety Code;

(2) the prescription, including a refill of the prescription, is for a period not to exceed 90 days;

(3) with regard to the refill of a prescription, the refill is authorized after consultation with the delegating physician and the consultation is noted in the patient's chart; and

(4) with regard to a prescription for a child less than two years of age, the prescription is made after consultation with the delegating physician and the consultation is noted in the patient's chart.

(b-1) A physician may delegate the prescribing or ordering of a controlled substance listed in Schedule II as established by the commissioner of the Department of State Health Services under Chapter 481, Health and Safety Code, only:

(1) in a hospital facility-based practice under Section 157.054, in accordance with policies approved by the hospital's medical staff or a committee of the hospital's medical staff as provided by the hospital bylaws to ensure patient safety, and as part of the care provided to a patient who:

(A) has been admitted to the hospital for an intended length of stay of 24 hours or greater; or

(B) is receiving services in the emergency department of the hospital; or

(2) as part of the plan of care for the treatment of a person who has executed a written certification of a terminal illness, has elected to receive hospice care, and is receiving hospice treatment from a qualified hospice provider.

(b-2) The board shall adopt rules that require a physician who delegates the prescribing or ordering of a drug or device to register with the board the name and license number of the physician assistant or advanced practice registered nurse to whom a delegation is made. The board may develop and use an electronic online delegation registration process for registration under this subsection.

(c) This subchapter does not modify the authority granted by law for a licensed registered nurse or physician assistant to administer or provide a medication, including a controlled substance listed in Schedule II as established by the commissioner of the Department of State Health Services under Chapter 481, Health and Safety Code, that is authorized by a physician under a physician's order, standing medical order, standing delegation order, or protocol.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 88, Sec. 2, eff. May 20, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 269 (S.B. 419), Sec. 1.28, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 746 (S.B. 532), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 418 (S.B. 406), Sec. 3, eff. November 1, 2013.

Sec. 157.0512. PRESCRIPTIVE AUTHORITY AGREEMENT. (a) A physician may delegate to an advanced practice registered nurse or physician assistant, acting under adequate physician supervision, the act of prescribing or ordering a drug or device as authorized through a prescriptive authority agreement between the physician and the advanced practice registered nurse or physician assistant, as applicable.

(b) A physician and an advanced practice registered nurse or physician assistant are eligible to enter into or be parties to a prescriptive authority agreement only if:

(1) if applicable, the Texas Board of Nursing has approved the advanced practice registered nurse's authority to prescribe or order a drug or device as authorized under this subchapter;

(2) the advanced practice registered nurse or physician assistant:

(A) holds an active license to practice in this state as an advanced practice registered nurse or physician assistant, as applicable, and is in good standing in this state; and

(B) is not currently prohibited by the Texas Board of Nursing or the Texas Physician Assistant Board, as applicable, from executing a prescriptive authority agreement; and

(3) before executing the prescriptive authority agreement, the physician and the advanced practice registered nurse or physician assistant disclose to the other prospective party to the agreement any prior disciplinary action by the board, the Texas Board of Nursing, or the Texas Physician Assistant Board, as applicable.

(c) Except as provided by Subsection (d), the combined number of advanced practice registered nurses and physician assistants with whom a physician may enter into a prescriptive authority agreement may not exceed seven advanced practice registered nurses and physician assistants or the full-time equivalent of seven advanced practice registered nurses and physician assistants.

(d) Subsection (c) does not apply to a prescriptive authority agreement if the prescriptive authority is being exercised in:

(1) a practice serving a medically underserved population; or

(2) a facility-based practice in a hospital under Section 157.054.

(e) A prescriptive authority agreement must, at a minimum:

(1) be in writing and signed and dated by the parties to the agreement;

(2) state the name, address, and all professional license numbers of the parties to the agreement;

(3) state the nature of the practice, practice locations, or practice settings;

(4) identify the types or categories of drugs or devices that may be prescribed or the types or categories of drugs or devices that may not be prescribed;

(5) provide a general plan for addressing consultation and referral;

(6) provide a plan for addressing patient emergencies;

(7) state the general process for communication and the sharing of information between the physician and the advanced practice registered nurse or physician assistant to whom the physician has delegated prescriptive authority related to the care and treatment of patients;

(8) if alternate physician supervision is to be utilized, designate one or more alternate physicians who may:

(A) provide appropriate supervision on a temporary basis in accordance with the requirements established by the prescriptive authority agreement and the requirements of this subchapter; and

(B) participate in the prescriptive authority quality assurance and improvement plan meetings required under this section; and

(9) describe a prescriptive authority quality assurance and improvement plan and specify methods for documenting the implementation of the plan that include the following:

(A) chart review, with the number of charts to be reviewed determined by the physician and advanced practice registered nurse or physician assistant; and

(B) periodic meetings between the advanced practice registered nurse or physician assistant and the physician.

(f) The periodic meetings described by Subsection (e)(9)(B) must:

(1) include:

(A) the sharing of information relating to patient treatment and care, needed changes in patient care plans, and issues relating to referrals; and

(B) discussion of patient care improvement;

(2) be documented; and

(3) take place at least once a month in a manner determined by the physician and the advanced practice registered nurse or physician assistant.

(f-1) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 38 (H.B. 278), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

(g) The prescriptive authority agreement may include other provisions agreed to by the physician and advanced practice registered nurse or physician assistant.

(h) If the parties to the prescriptive authority agreement practice in a physician group practice, the physician may appoint one or more alternate supervising physicians designated under Subsection (e)(8), if any, to conduct and document the quality assurance meetings in accordance with the requirements of this subchapter.

(i) The prescriptive authority agreement need not describe the exact steps that an advanced practice registered nurse or physician assistant must take with respect to each specific condition, disease, or symptom.

(j) A physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or physician assistant who is a party to a prescriptive authority agreement must retain a copy of the agreement until the second anniversary of the date the agreement is terminated.

(k) A party to a prescriptive authority agreement may not by contract waive, void, or nullify any provision of this section or Section 157.0513.

(l) In the event that a party to a prescriptive authority agreement is notified that the individual has become the subject of an investigation by the board, the Texas Board of Nursing, or the Texas Physician Assistant Board, the individual shall immediately notify the other party to the prescriptive authority agreement.

(m) The prescriptive authority agreement and any amendments must be reviewed at least annually, dated, and signed by the parties to the agreement. The prescriptive authority agreement and any amendments must be made available to the board, the Texas Board of Nursing, or the Texas Physician Assistant Board not later than the third business day after the date of receipt of request, if any.

(n) The prescriptive authority agreement should promote the exercise of professional judgment by the advanced practice registered nurse or physician assistant commensurate with the advanced practice registered nurse's or physician assistant's education and experience and the relationship between the advanced practice registered nurse or physician assistant and the physician.

(o) This section shall be liberally construed to allow the use of prescriptive authority agreements to safely and effectively utilize the skills and services of advanced practice registered nurses and physician assistants.

(p) The board may not adopt rules pertaining to the elements of a prescriptive authority agreement that would impose requirements in addition to the requirements under this section. The board may adopt other rules relating to physician delegation under this chapter.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 418 (S.B. 406), Sec. 4, eff. November 1, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 928 (S.B. 1625), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 38 (H.B. 278), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 38 (H.B. 278), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 157.0513. PRESCRIPTIVE AUTHORITY AGREEMENT: INFORMATION. (a) The board, the Texas Board of Nursing, and the Texas Physician Assistant Board shall jointly develop a process:

(1) to exchange information regarding the names, locations, and license numbers of each physician, advanced practice registered nurse, and physician assistant who has entered into a prescriptive authority agreement;

(2) by which each board shall immediately notify the other boards when a license holder of the board becomes the subject of an investigation involving the delegation and supervision of prescriptive authority, as well as the final disposition of any such investigation;

(3) by which each board shall maintain and share a list of the board's license holders who have been subject to a final adverse disciplinary action for an act involving the delegation and supervision of prescriptive authority; and

(4) to ensure that each advanced practice registered nurse or physician assistant who has entered into a prescriptive authority agreement authorizing the prescribing of opioids is required to complete not less than two hours of continuing education annually regarding safe and effective pain management related to the prescription of opioids and other controlled substances, including education regarding:

(A) reasonable standards of care;

(B) the identification of drug-seeking behavior in patients; and

(C) effectively communicating with patients regarding the prescription of an opioid or other controlled substance.

(b) If the board, the Texas Board of Nursing, or the Texas Physician Assistant Board receives a notice under Subsection (a)(2), the board that received notice may open an investigation against a license holder of the board who is a party to a prescriptive authority agreement with the license holder who is under investigation by the board that provided notice under Subsection (a)(2).

(c) The board shall maintain and make available to the public a searchable online list of physicians, advanced practice registered nurses, and physician assistants who have entered into a prescriptive authority agreement authorized under Section 157.0512 and identify the physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or physician assistant with whom each physician, advanced practice registered nurse, and physician assistant has entered into a prescriptive authority agreement.

(d) The board shall collaborate with the Texas Board of Nursing and the Texas Physician Assistant Board to maintain and make available to the public a list of physicians, advanced practice registered nurses, and physician assistants who are prohibited from entering into or practicing under a prescriptive authority agreement.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 418 (S.B. 406), Sec. 4, eff. November 1, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 818 (H.B. 2454), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 157.0514. PRESCRIPTIVE AUTHORITY AGREEMENT: INSPECTIONS. If the board receives a notice under Section 157.0513(a)(2), the board or an authorized board representative may enter, with reasonable notice and at a reasonable time, unless the notice would jeopardize an investigation, a site where a party to a prescriptive authority agreement practices to inspect and audit any records or activities relating to the implementation and operation of the agreement. To the extent reasonably possible, the board and the board's authorized representative shall conduct any inspection or audit under this section in a manner that minimizes disruption to the delivery of patient care.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 418 (S.B. 406), Sec. 4, eff. November 1, 2013.

Sec. 157.054. PRESCRIBING AT FACILITY-BASED PRACTICE SITES. (a) One or more physicians licensed by the board may delegate, to one or more physician assistants or advanced practice registered nurses acting under adequate physician supervision whose practice is facility-based at a hospital or licensed long-term care facility, the administration or provision of a drug and the prescribing or ordering of a drug or device if each of the delegating physicians is:

(1) the medical director or chief of medical staff of the facility in which the physician assistant or advanced practice registered nurse practices;

(2) the chair of the facility's credentialing committee;

(3) a department chair of a facility department in which the physician assistant or advanced practice registered nurse practices; or

(4) a physician who consents to the request of the medical director or chief of medical staff to delegate the prescribing or ordering of a drug or device at the facility in which the physician assistant or advanced practice registered nurse practices.

(a-1) The limits on the number of advanced practice registered nurses or physician assistants to whom a physician may delegate under Section 157.0512 do not apply to a physician under Subsection (a) whose practice is facility-based under this section, provided that the physician is not delegating in a freestanding clinic, center, or practice of the facility.

(b) A physician's authority to delegate under Subsection (a) is limited as follows:

(1) the delegation must be made under a physician's order, standing medical order, standing delegation order, or another order or protocol developed in accordance with policies approved by the facility's medical staff or a committee of the facility's medical staff as provided by the facility bylaws;

(2) the delegation must occur in the facility in which the physician is the medical director, the chief of medical staff, the chair of the credentialing committee, a department chair, or a physician who consents to delegate under Subsection (a)(4);

(3) the delegation may not permit the prescribing or ordering of a drug or device for the care or treatment of the patients of any other physician without the prior consent of that physician; and

(4) delegation in a long-term care facility must be by the medical director and is limited to the prescribing or ordering of a drug or device to not more than seven advanced practice registered nurses or physician assistants or their full-time equivalents.

(b-1) A facility-based physician may not delegate at more than one hospital or more than two long-term care facilities under this section unless approved by the board. The facility-based physician may not be prohibited from delegating the prescribing or ordering of drugs or devices under Section 157.0512 at other practice locations, including hospitals or long-term care facilities, provided that the delegation at those locations complies with all the requirements of Section 157.0512.

(c) Physician supervision of the prescribing or ordering of a drug or device must conform to what a reasonable, prudent physician would find consistent with sound medical judgment but may vary with the education and experience of the particular advanced practice registered nurse or physician assistant. A physician shall provide continuous supervision, but the constant physical presence of the physician is not required.

(d) An alternate physician may provide appropriate supervision on a temporary basis as defined and established by board rule.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 88, Sec. 5, eff. May 20, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 746 (S.B. 532), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 418 (S.B. 406), Sec. 5, eff. November 1, 2013.

Sec. 157.055. ORDERS AND PROTOCOLS. A protocol or other order shall be defined in a manner that promotes the exercise of professional judgment by the advanced practice registered nurse and physician assistant commensurate with the education and experience of that person. Under this section, an order or protocol used by a reasonable and prudent physician exercising sound medical judgment:

(1) is not required to describe the exact steps that an advanced practice registered nurse or a physician assistant must take with respect to each specific condition, disease, or symptom; and

(2) may state the types or categories of medications that may be prescribed or the types or categories of medications that may not be prescribed.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 418 (S.B. 406), Sec. 6, eff. November 1, 2013.

Sec. 157.056. PRESCRIPTION INFORMATION. The following information must be provided on each prescription subject to this subchapter:

(1) the patient's name and address;

(2) the drug to be dispensed;

(3) directions to the patient regarding the taking of the drug and the dosage;

(4) the intended use of the drug, if appropriate;

(5) the name, address, and telephone number of the physician;

(6) the name, address, telephone number, and identification number of the registered nurse or physician assistant completing or signing the prescription drug order;

(7) the date; and

(8) the number of refills permitted.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 157.057. ADDITIONAL IMPLEMENTATION METHODS. The board may adopt additional methods to implement:

(1) a physician's prescription; or

(2) the delegation of prescriptive authority.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 418 (S.B. 406), Sec. 7, eff. November 1, 2013.

Sec. 157.058. DELEGATION TO CERTIFIED REGISTERED NURSE ANESTHETIST. (a) In a licensed hospital or ambulatory surgical center, a physician may delegate to a certified registered nurse anesthetist the ordering of drugs and devices necessary for the nurse anesthetist to administer an anesthetic or an anesthesia-related service ordered by the physician.

(b) The physician's order for anesthesia or anesthesia-related services is not required to specify a drug, dose, or administration technique.

(c) Pursuant to the physician's order and in accordance with facility policies or medical staff bylaws, the nurse anesthetist may select, obtain, and administer those drugs and apply the medical devices appropriate to accomplish the order and maintain the patient within a sound physiological status.

(d) This section shall be liberally construed to permit the full use of safe and effective medication orders to use the skills and services of certified registered nurse anesthetists.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 157.059. DELEGATION REGARDING CERTAIN OBSTETRICAL SERVICES. (a) In this section, "provide" means to supply, for a term not to exceed 48 hours, one or more unit doses of a controlled substance for the immediate needs of a patient.

(b) A physician may delegate to a physician assistant offering obstetrical services and certified by the board as specializing in obstetrics or an advanced practice registered nurse recognized by the Texas Board of Nursing as a nurse midwife the act of administering or providing controlled substances to the physician assistant's or nurse midwife's clients during intrapartum and immediate postpartum care.

(c) The physician may not delegate:

(1) the use of a prescription sticker or the use or issuance of an official prescription form; or

(2) the authority to issue an electronic prescription under Section 481.075, Health and Safety Code.

(d) The delegation of authority to administer or provide controlled substances under Subsection (b) must be under a physician's order, medical order, standing delegation order, prescriptive authority agreement, or protocol that requires adequate and documented availability for access to medical care.

(e) The physician's orders, medical orders, standing delegation orders, prescriptive authority agreements, or protocols must require the reporting of or monitoring of each client's progress, including complications of pregnancy and delivery and the administration and provision of controlled substances by the nurse midwife or physician assistant to the clients of the nurse midwife or physician assistant.

(f) The authority of a physician to delegate under this section is limited to:

(1) seven nurse midwives or physician assistants or their full-time equivalents; and

(2) the designated facility at which the nurse midwife or physician assistant provides care.

(g) The controlled substance must be supplied in a suitable container that is labeled in compliance with the applicable drug laws and must include:

(1) the patient's name and address;

(2) the drug to be provided;

(3) the name, address, and telephone number of the physician;

(4) the name, address, and telephone number of the nurse midwife or physician assistant; and

(5) the date.

(h) This section does not authorize a physician, physician assistant, or nurse midwife to operate a retail pharmacy as defined under Subtitle J.

(i) This section authorizes a physician to delegate the act of administering or providing a controlled substance to a nurse midwife or physician assistant but does not require physician delegation of:

(1) further acts to a nurse midwife; or

(2) the administration of medications by a physician assistant or registered nurse other than as provided by this section.

(j) This section does not limit the authority of a physician to delegate the prescribing or ordering of a controlled substance under this subchapter.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 88, Sec. 7, eff. May 20, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 889 (H.B. 2426), Sec. 33, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 746 (S.B. 532), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1228 (S.B. 594), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 418 (S.B. 406), Sec. 8, eff. November 1, 2013.

Sec. 157.060. PHYSICIAN LIABILITY FOR DELEGATED ACT. Unless the physician has reason to believe the physician assistant or advanced practice registered nurse lacked the competency to perform the act, a physician is not liable for an act of a physician assistant or advanced practice registered nurse solely because the physician signed a standing medical order, a standing delegation order, or another order or protocol, or entered into a prescriptive authority agreement, authorizing the physician assistant or advanced practice registered nurse to administer, provide, prescribe, or order a drug or device.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 418 (S.B. 406), Sec. 9, eff. November 1, 2013.

SUBCHAPTER C. DELEGATION TO PHARMACISTS

Sec. 157.101. DELEGATION TO PHARMACIST. (a) In this section, "pharmacist" has the meaning assigned by Section 551.003.

(b) A physician may delegate to a properly qualified and trained pharmacist acting under adequate physician supervision the performance of specific acts of drug therapy management authorized by the physician through the physician's order, standing medical order, standing delegation order, or other order or protocol as defined by board rule.

(b-1) A delegation under Subsection (b) may include:

(1) the implementation or modification of a patient's drug therapy under a protocol if:

(A) the delegation follows a diagnosis, initial patient assessment, and drug therapy order by the physician; and

(B) the pharmacist maintains a copy of the protocol for inspection until at least the seventh anniversary of the expiration date of the protocol; or

(2) the authority to sign a prescription drug order for dangerous drugs for a patient if:

(A) the delegation follows a diagnosis, initial patient assessment, and drug therapy order by the physician;

(B) the pharmacist practices in a federally qualified health center, a hospital, a hospital-based clinic, or an academic health care institution;

(C) the federally qualified health center, hospital, hospital-based clinic, or academic health care institution in which the pharmacist practices has bylaws and a medical staff policy that permit a physician to delegate to a pharmacist the management of a patient's drug therapy;

(D) the pharmacist provides the name, address, and telephone number of the pharmacist and of the delegating physician on each prescription signed by the pharmacist; and

(E) the pharmacist provides a copy of the protocol to the Texas State Board of Pharmacy.

(c) Physician supervision is considered to be adequate for the purposes of this section if a delegating physician:

(1) is responsible for the formulation or approval of the physician's order, standing medical order, standing delegation order, or other order or protocol and periodically reviews the order or protocol and the services provided to a patient under the order or protocol;

(2) has established a physician-patient relationship with each patient who is provided drug therapy management by a delegated pharmacist;

(3) is geographically located so as to be able to be physically present daily to provide medical care and supervision;

(4) receives, as appropriate, a periodic status report on each patient, including any problem or complication encountered; and

(5) is available through direct telecommunication for consultation, assistance, and direction.

(d) This section does not restrict the use of a preestablished health care program or restrict a physician from authorizing the provision of patient care by use of a preestablished health care program if the patient is institutionalized and the care is to be delivered in a licensed hospital with an organized medical staff that has authorized standing delegation orders, standing medical orders, or protocols.

(e) This section does not limit, expand, or change any provision of law relating to therapeutic drug substitution or administration of medication, including Section 554.004.

(f) The board by rule shall establish the minimum content of a written order or protocol. The order or protocol may not permit the delegation of medical diagnosis.

Text of subsection effective until April 01, 2025

(g) In this section, "federally qualified health center" has the meaning assigned by Section 531.02192, Government Code.

Text of subsection effective on April 01, 2025

(g) In this section, "federally qualified health center" has the meaning assigned by 42 U.S.C. Section 1396d(l)(2)(B).

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 271 (S.B. 381), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 197 (H.B. 2425), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 976 (S.B. 1056), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 2.144, eff. April 1, 2025.